North Dakota statutes. TITLE 45 Partnerships
CHAPTER 45-12 Application of Law

45-12-01.
Provisions for existing limited partnerships. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 19.

45-12-02.
Provisions for other existing partnerships.

Except for a general partnership governed by subsection 2, a general partnership formed under any statute of this state prior to July 1, 1959, including the general partners of a special or limited partnership formed prior to July 1, 1959, are governed by the provisions of chapters 45-05 through 45-12, until January 1, 1997, from and after July 1, 1959. After December 31, 1996, all partnerships are governed as provided in subsection 3.

Before January 1, 1997, chapters 45-13 through 45-21 govern only a partnership formed:

After January 1, 1996, unless that partnership is continuing the business of a dissolved partnership under section 45-09-13; and

Before January 1, 1996, that elects, as provided by subsection 4, to be governed by chapters 45-13 through 45-21.

After December 31, 1996, chapters 45-13 through 45-21 govern all partnerships.

Before January 1, 1997, a partnership voluntarily may elect, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be governed by chapters 45-13 through 45-21. Provisions of chapters 45-13 through 45-21 relating to the liability of the partnership’s partners to third parties apply to limit those partners’ liability to a third party who had done business with the partnership within one year preceding the partnership’s election to be governed by chapters 45-13 through 45-21, only if the third party knows or has received a notification of the partnership’s election to be governed by chapters 45-13 through 45-21.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 326; 1995, ch. 430, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Registration and Operation of North Dakota and Minnesota Limited Liability Partnerships, 72 N.D. L. Rev. 555 (1996).

45-12-03.
Repeal.

Except as affecting existing limited or special partnerships to the extent set forth in section 45-12-01, chapters 45-01, 45-02, 45-03, and 45-04 are hereby repealed.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 326.

45-12-04.
Citation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 430, § 12.